Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.901

Spiritual care services—2012 c 87.

Nothing in chapter 87, Laws of 2012 prohibits the offering of benefits for spiritual care services deductible under section 213(d) of the internal revenue code in health plans inside and outside of the exchange.

[ 2012 c 87 s 14.]